FraudulentFur.xfst
# Shuffle is a general operation
# Both within and across morpheme boundaries
define Shuffle a e (->) e a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, e a (->) a e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a i (->) i a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, i a (->) a i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a I (->) I a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, I a (->) a I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a o (->) o a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o a (->) a o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a u (->) u a %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u a (->) a u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e i (->) i e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, i e (->) e i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e I (->) I e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, I e (->) e I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e o (->) o e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o e (->) e o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
e u (->) u e %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u e (->) e u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
i I (->) I i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, I i (->) i I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
i o (->) o i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o i (->) i o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
i u (->) u i %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u i (->) i u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
I o (->) o I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, o I (->) I o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
I u (->) u I %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u I (->) I u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
o u (->) u o %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph, u o (->) o u %+MetVV %+MetWithinMorph,
a e (->) e a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, e a (->) a e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ i (->) i %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, i %+ a (->) a %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ I (->) I %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, I %+ a (->) a %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ o (->) o %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ a (->) a %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
a %+ u (->) u %+ a %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ a (->) a %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ i (->) i %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, i %+ e (->) e %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ I (->) I %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, I %+ e (->) e %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ o (->) o %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ e (->) e %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
e %+ u (->) u %+ e %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ e (->) e %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ I (->) I %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, I %+ i (->) i %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ o (->) o %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ i (->) i %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
i %+ u (->) u %+ i %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ i (->) i %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ o (->) o %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, o %+ I (->) I %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
I %+ u (->) u %+ I %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ I (->) I %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
o %+ u (->) u %+ o %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph, u %+ o (->) o %+ u %+MetVV %+MetBetweenMorph,
h q (->) q h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, q h (->) h q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h b (->) b h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, h d (->) d h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
h m (->) m h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m h (->) h m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
q m (->) m q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m q (->) q m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b m (->) m b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f m (->) m f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m f (->) f m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m b (->) b m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
d m (->) m d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m d (->) d m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
g m (->) m g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m g (->) g m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
p m (->) m p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m p (->) p m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
p m (->) m p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m p (->) p m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
t m (->) m t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m t (->) t m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
k m (->) m k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
m k (->) k m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
h f (->) f h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f h (->) h f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
q f (->) f q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f q (->) q f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b f (->) f b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f b (->) b f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
d f (->) f d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f d (->) d f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
g f (->) f g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f g (->) g f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
p f (->) f p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f p (->) p f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
p f (->) f p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f p (->) p f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
t f (->) f t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f t (->) t f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
k f (->) f k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
f k (->) k f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
h g (->) g h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
g h (->) h g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d h (->) h d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b h (->) h b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
h t (->) t h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t h (->) h t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h k (->) k h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k h (->) h k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h p (->) p h %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, p h (->) h p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
q b (->) b q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, q d (->) d q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
q g (->) g q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph %+MetWithinMorph, 
g q (->) q g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d q (->) q d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b q (->) q b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph %+MetWithinMorph,
q t (->) t q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t q (->) q t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
q k (->) k q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k q (->) q k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
q p (->) p q %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, p q (->) q p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
b d (->) d b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, b g (->) g b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
g b (->) b g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d b (->) b d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
b t (->) t b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t b (->) b t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
b k (->) k b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k b (->) b k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
d g (->) g d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, g d (->) d g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, 
d t (->) t d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t d (->) d t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
d k (->) k d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k d (->) d k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
g t (->) t g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t g (->) g t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
g k (->) k g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k g (->) g k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
k t (->) t k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t k (->) k t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
# l + obs within
l b (->) b l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, b l (->) l b %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l d (->) d l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, d l (->) l d %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l g (->) g l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, g l (->) l g %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l p (->) p l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, p l (->) l p %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l t (->) t l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, t l (->) l t %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l k (->) k l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, k l (->) l k %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l m (->) m l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, m l (->) l m %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
l f (->) f l %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph, f l (->) l f %+MetCC %+MetWithinMorph,
h %+ q (->) q %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ h (->) h %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
h %+ b (->) b %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ d (->) d %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ g (->) g %+ h %+MetBetweenMorph, 
g %+ h (->) h %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ h (->) h %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ h (->) h %+ b %+MetBetweenMorph, 
h %+ t (->) t %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ h (->) h %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
h %+ k (->) k %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ h (->) h %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
h %+ p (->) p %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ h (->) h %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ b (->) b %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ d (->) d %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ g (->) g %+ q %+MetBetweenMorph, 
g %+ q (->) q %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ q (->) q %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ q (->) q %+ b %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ t (->) t %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ q (->) q %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ k (->) k %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ q (->) q %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
q %+ p (->) p %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ q (->) q %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
b %+ d (->) d %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ g (->) g %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, 
g %+ b (->) b %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ b (->) b %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, 
b %+ t (->) t %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ b (->) b %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
b %+ k (->) k %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ b (->) b %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
d %+ g (->) g %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ d (->) d %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, 
d %+ t (->) t %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ d (->) d %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
d %+ k (->) k %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ d (->) d %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
g %+ t (->) t %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ g (->) g %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
g %+ k (->) k %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ g (->) g %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
k %+ t (->) t %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ k (->) k %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
# m + obs between
m %+ q (->) q %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ m (->) m %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ h (->) h %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ m (->) m %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ b (->) b %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ m (->) m %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ d (->) d %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ m (->) m %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ g (->) g %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ m (->) m %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ p (->) p %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ m (->) m %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ t (->) t %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ m (->) m %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
m %+ k (->) k %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ m (->) m %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
# f + obs between
f %+ q (->) q %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, q %+ f (->) f %+ q %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ h (->) h %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, h %+ f (->) f %+ h %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ b (->) b %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ f (->) f %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ d (->) d %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ f (->) f %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ g (->) g %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ f (->) f %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ p (->) p %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ f (->) f %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ t (->) t %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ f (->) f %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
f %+ k (->) k %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ f (->) f %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
# l + obs + b/t
l %+ b (->) b %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, b %+ l (->) l %+ b %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ d (->) d %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, d %+ l (->) l %+ d %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ g (->) g %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, g %+ l (->) l %+ g %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ p (->) p %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, p %+ l (->) l %+ p %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ t (->) t %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, t %+ l (->) l %+ t %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ k (->) k %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, k %+ l (->) l %+ k %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ m (->) m %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, m %+ l (->) l %+ m %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
l %+ f (->) f %+ l %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph, f %+ l (->) l %+ f %+MetCC %+MetBetweenMorph,
a b (->) b a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b a (->) a b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a d (->) d a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d a (->) a d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a g (->) g a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g a (->) a g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a h (->) h a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h a (->) a h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a k (->) k a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k a (->) a k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a p (->) p a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, p a (->) a p %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a q (->) q a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, q a (->) a q %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
a t (->) t a %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, t a (->) a t %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e b (->) b e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, b e (->) e b %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e d (->) d e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, d e (->) e d %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e g (->) g e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, g e (->) e g %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e h (->) h e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, h e (->) e h %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
e k (->) k e %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph, k e (->) e k %+MetCV %+MetWithinMorph,
